Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 22 Curriculum [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-22-31.
Curriculum frameworks.

The council on elementary and secondary education (the “council”) shall direct the commissioner of elementary and secondary education (the “commissioner”) to institute a process to develop curriculum frameworks for mathematics, English language arts, science and technology, history and social studies, world languages, and the arts. This process shall:

Be open and consultative;

Include, but need not be limited to, a culturally and racially diverse group of classroom teachers and students; and

Include, but need not be limited to, reviewing and revising current frameworks, as well as developing new ones, if deemed appropriate.

The process may include, but need not be limited to, community groups, cultural organizations, parents, teacher preparation programs, and leading college and university figures in both subject matter disciplines and pedagogy.

The commissioner shall develop the curriculum frameworks pursuant to this section by no later than September 1, 2021, and again as required by the council’s procedures set forth in subsection (e) of this section. The curriculum frameworks developed by the commissioner shall:

Present broad, research-based pedagogical approaches and strategies to assist students develop the skills, competencies, and knowledge called for by the statewide standards provided in §

16-22-30

;

Provide sufficient detail to guide and inform processes for the education, professional development, certification, and evaluation of both active and aspiring teachers and administrators;

Provide sufficient detail to guide the implementation of student assessment instruments;

Be constructed to guide and assist teachers, administrators, publishers, software developers, and other interested parties in the development and selection of curricula, textbooks, technology, and other instructional materials, and in the design of pedagogical approaches and strategies for use in elementary, secondary, and career and technical schools;

Be aligned with the state’s commitment to college and career readiness;

Encourage demanding real-world application, multidisciplinary problem solving, integration of academic and career and technical education curriculum, project-based learning, performance assessment, team teaching, and alignment of classroom instruction with work-based learning opportunities;

Promote better alignment with postsecondary curriculum and instruction, including, but not limited to, the expansion and/or use of dual enrollment and dual credit opportunities for high school students that help them with the postsecondary transition, persistence, and attainment of a credential;

Encourage capstone projects and associated performance assessments that provide students the opportunity to demonstrate holistic proficiency with respect to research, cross-disciplinary problem solving, critical thinking, communication, collaboration, and oral defense;

Present specific, pedagogical approaches and strategies to meet the academic and nonacademic needs of English learner, economically disadvantaged, special education, and academically advanced students;

Be designed to avoid perpetuating gender, cultural, ethnic, or racial stereotypes;

Reflect sensitivity to different learning styles;

Reflect sensitivity to impediments to learning, which may include issues related to, but not limited to, cultural, financial, emotional, health, and social factors; and

Be in a form readily comprehensible by the general public.

The commissioner shall submit a copy of the frameworks to the council for approval at least sixty (60) days prior to the frameworks taking effect.

Upon approval, the council shall make the frameworks available to the public.

The council shall develop procedures for updating, improving, or refining curriculum frameworks pursuant to this section by no later than September 1, 2021. The procedures shall include a requirement that the council review and evaluate the frameworks regularly to ensure that the high quality of the frameworks is maintained. The review cycle shall begin in 2025, with subsequent reviews taking place in 2029, 2033, and every four (4) years thereafter.

On or before December 1, 2020, and annually thereafter on or before December 1, the commissioner shall report to the governor, president of the senate, and the speaker of the house, regarding the curriculum frameworks developed and reviewed pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 150, § 1.

16-22-32.
High quality curriculum and materials.

The council on elementary and secondary education (the “council”) shall direct the commissioner of elementary and secondary education (the “commissioner”) to institute a process for reviewing and identifying curriculum and materials for mathematics, English language arts, and science and technology that meet the following requirements:

Is aligned with the academic standards provided in §

16-22-30

;

Is aligned with the curriculum frameworks provided in §

16-22-31

;

Is aligned with the RICAS, or any other test that is adopted as a statewide standardized test; and

Is of high quality.

The commissioner shall identify at least five (5) examples each of curricula for mathematics and English language arts pursuant to this section by no later than January 1, 2021, for science and technology pursuant to this section by no later than January 1, 2024, and again as required by the council’s procedures set forth in subsection (a)(8) of this section. Once identified, the curricula shall be made available to the public, subject to copyright considerations.

The commissioner shall direct all local education agencies (“LEAs”) to select one of the identified high-quality curricula and materials by the time of their next adoption cycle, but in any case, no later than June 30, 2023, for mathematics and English language arts, and no later than June 30, 2025, for science and technology. LEAs shall select curriculum and materials that are responsive to the LEA’s cultural and linguistic needs, and support culturally responsive practices. LEAs shall implement the high-quality curricula and materials at the start of the school year that immediately follows the selection. If an LEA is unable to implement the high-quality curricula and materials fully due to financial hardship, the commissioner may grant the LEA an extension of time, provided that the LEA demonstrates continued efforts to complete the implementation.

The commissioner shall institute a waiver process for LEAs that would like to use a curriculum other than any identified by the commissioner pursuant to this section. Part of that process may include, but is not limited to, asking the LEA to:

Develop local curriculum goals;

Communicate the rationale for selecting the proposed curriculum over any of the curricula identified by the commissioner; and

Engage a third-party reviewer that has a proven track record of curriculum audits to review the proposed curriculum to ensure it aligns with state standards, establishes the scope and sequence of instruction, is of high quality, is culturally relevant, and to discuss any other strengths and weaknesses.

Waiver determinations made pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section shall be appealable to the board of education.

Any LEA that has at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its students meeting expectations on state assessments and also has no student subgroup identified for targeted assistance under Rhode Island’s accountability process may select and use curricula and materials other than any identified by the commissioner pursuant to this section for that subject area, only; provided, however, that if the LEA no longer has at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its students meeting expectations on state assessments, or if any student subgroup is identified for targeted assistance under Rhode Island’s accountability process, the LEA must select and implement one of the curricula identified by the commissioner pursuant to this section.

LEAs shall develop and execute a curriculum implementation plan that includes professional development to ensure that all teachers and administrators are prepared to implement the new curriculum with the necessary skill and knowledge.

The council shall develop procedures for updating the identification of curricula and materials pursuant to this section by no later than September 1, 2021. The procedures shall include a requirement that the council review and evaluate the identified curricula and materials regularly to ensure that the high quality of the curricula and materials is maintained. The review cycle shall begin in 2025, with subsequent reviews taking place in 2029, 2033, and every four (4) years thereafter.

On or before December 1, 2020, and annually thereafter on or before December 1, the commissioner shall report to the governor, president of the senate, and the speaker of the house, regarding the progress toward fulfilling the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, the high-quality curricula and materials identified, selected, and implemented by LEAs pursuant to this section.

The state shall establish a professional development fund to provide professional learning to LEAs that elect to use prioritized curricula and materials in mathematics and English language arts as identified by the commissioner.

For the purposes of this section, “local education agencies” (“LEAs”) shall include all of the following within the state of Rhode Island:

Public school districts;

Regional school districts;

State-operated schools;

Regional collaborative schools; and

Charter schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 150, § 1.

16-22-33.
Curriculum implementation accountability.

Once local education agencies (“LEAs”) select high-quality curriculum and materials pursuant to §

16-22-32

, the department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall identify an LEA assistance partner from within the department to provide any and all support requested by the LEA or individual schools within the LEA regarding access to, implementation of, and professional development for the curriculum and materials.

The LEA assistance partner shall meet with teachers, principals, administrators, or other school officials of the LEA to which they are assigned at a school within the LEA on a regular basis, which shall be no less frequently than every three (3) months, to discuss the progress toward implementing the curriculum and materials effectively. Areas of discussion may include, but are not limited to:

Barriers to learning and plans to eliminate said barriers;

Best practices regarding pedagogical techniques given the diversity of the student population being served;

Where to locate additional professional development resources; and

Implementation strategies that have been successful to share with other LEAs that are using the same curriculum and materials.

The LEA assistance partner shall tour all schools within its assigned LEA with at least one teacher and the principal or assistant principal:

To observe challenges teachers are facing while implementing the curriculum and materials;

To discuss with the teacher and principal or assistant principal ideas to help resolve those challenges; and

To answer any questions regarding the curriculum or implementation thereof.

The LEA assistance partner shall have follow-up meetings at schools within their assigned LEA as often as requested by an individual school or the entire LEA to ensure all educators are comfortable implementing the curriculum effectively.

The LEA assistance partner shall report to the department no less frequently than every three (3) months regarding the status of curriculum implementation at the schools within their assigned LEA.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

For the purposes of this section, “local education agencies” (“LEAs”) shall include all of the following within the state of Rhode Island:

Public school districts;

Regional school districts;

State-operated schools;

Regional collaborative schools; and

Charter schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 150, § 1.

16-22-34.
The basic education program.

For the purposes of this chapter, the “basic education program” means a set of regulations promulgated by the council on elementary and secondary education pursuant to its delegated statutory authority to determine standards for the Rhode Island public education system and the maintenance of local appropriation to support its implementation under Rhode Island general laws.

The basic education program (BEP) shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following basic elements:

A standard for students who are English language learners; and

Any other requirements set forth elsewhere in Rhode Island general laws or departmental regulations.

By August 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall review BEP compliance of each local education agency (LEA) within the state. The department shall:

Assess programmatic compliance with the BEP to ensure high-quality education is available to all public school students, regardless of where they reside or which school they attend;

Determine the incremental cost to meet the BEP utilizing uniform chart of account (UCOA) data from the LEA and all LEAs statewide;

Determine the sufficiency of both the state and the local education aid to the LEA to meet the BEP; and

If a deficiency exists in the local education aid to the LEA to meet the BEP, the department shall consult with the department of revenue to issue a joint report to the general assembly on the feasibility of the municipality to raise sufficient funds to meet the BEP standard set in law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 3, effective July 6, 2021.

16-22-35.
Littering prevention and recycling awareness program.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall, in collaboration with the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, prescribe a presentation on litter prevention, reducing and reusing materials, and recycling awareness that shall be used to educate every public elementary and middle school student within the state on a yearly basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 272, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 273, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

16-22-36.
Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander history study.

Beginning with the 2023-2024 school year, every public elementary school and secondary school shall include in its curriculum a unit of instruction studying the events of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander (AA and NHPI) history, including the history of AA and NHPIs in Rhode Island and the Northeast, as well as the contributions of AA and NHPIs toward advancing civil rights from the 19th century onward. These events shall include the contributions made by individual AA and NHPIs in government and the arts, humanities, and sciences, as well as the contributions of AA and NHPI communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. The studying of this material shall constitute an affirmation by students of their commitment to respect the dignity of all races and peoples and to forever eschew every form of discrimination in their lives and careers.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall make available to all school districts instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for development of a unit of instruction under this section. Provided, however, each school district shall itself determine the minimum amount of instructional time that qualifies as a unit of instruction satisfying the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 291, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 292, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

16-22-37.
Dual language immersion model policy and timeline.

The Rhode Island department of education (“department”), in consultation with local education agencies (“LEAs”) that have a dual language immersion program, shall create a model policy and timeline to assist LEAs in developing and implementing a dual language immersion program.

The LEAs approached by the department to consult on the model policy and timeline pursuant to subsection (a) shall cooperate with the department’s requests or inquiries related to any dual language immersion program in a timely manner.

The model policy and timeline shall:

Be accessed easily by LEAs through electronic publication or other public distribution; and

Include, but need not be limited to:

A detailed description of best practices;

A step-by-step timeline; and

A list of sources consulted and additional resources to which LEAs may refer if any questions arise concerning the development and implementation of a dual language immersion program.

The model policy and timeline shall be sent to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives by January 1, 2023. The department shall also report to the general assembly, beginning on July 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, the number of LEAs with dual language immersion programs, the number of students served in a dual language immersion program by grade level, and the number of teachers for each grade with a dual language immersion program for the most recent school year.

The Rhode Island department of education shall:

Research the educational impact of dual language immersion programs across New England and report the findings to the general assembly no later than July 31, 2023; and

Encourage LEAs to expand or develop courses in world languages in order that students in elementary and middle schools have access to these courses.

For the purposes of this section, “local education agencies” shall include all of the following within the state of Rhode Island:

Public school districts;

Regional school districts;

State-operated schools;

Regional collaborative schools; and

Charter schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 362, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 363, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

16-22-38.
Career and technical education programs. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The school committees of the several cities, towns, and school districts shall provide for pupils in the public schools in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) to be taught and be required to study courses that include instruction in career and technical education programs that include knowledge of careers and all types of employment opportunities, including, but not limited to, registered apprenticeships in accordance with chapter 45 of title 28, and emphasizing the advantages of completing school with marketable skills.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 346, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 347, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.